District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.212

Eligibility requirements.

An applicant for licensure as a steam or other operating engineer shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Industrial Trades that:

(1)

For a steam engineer, the applicant has the requisite experience and knowledge to operate steam or hot water boilers for the class of licensure applied for, as determined by the Board of Industrial Trades by regulation; and

(2)

For an operating engineer, the applicant has the requisite experience and knowledge to operate heavy equipment of the class for which licensure is sought, as determined by the Board of Industrial Trades.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.212.